Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 20 Ownership of Electric-Generating Facilities

39-20-1.
Declaration of public necessity.

Since reliable and economic bulk electric power supply is essential to the safety, health, morals, and welfare of the state and to the sound growth of the communities therein, and in order to promote the general welfare and insure the future power needs of the inhabitants of this state, it is hereby declared to be in the public interest and for a public purpose:

That electric utilities operating in the New England states be permitted to participate together in the common ownership of electric-generating facilities that will contribute towards a reliable bulk power supply in New England, achieve increased reliability and economies of generation, and thereby promote lower overall cost of power within the state;

That such advantages can be obtained through joint planning, ownership, operation, and use, or any combination thereof, of electric-generating facilities within or without the state for the generation of electricity to be consumed within or without the state;

That domestic electric utilities be authorized and granted rights both within and without the state to participate in the ownership of electric-generating facilities; and

That foreign electric utilities be authorized and granted rights within this state to own or participate in the ownership of electric-generating facilities.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1.

39-20-2.
Definitions.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the following words shall have the following meanings:

“Commission” means the public utilities commission.

“Division” means the division of public utilities and carriers.

“Domestic electric utility” means an electric utility organized under the laws of, or having its principal place of business in, this state.

“Electric-generating facilities” means electric-generating units rated five hundred megawatts (500 MW) or above, and generating stations in commercial generation on or before January 1, 1990, that are subsequently altered or modified to increase the rating of these stations by at least two hundred megawatts (200 MW), and related facilities including those for the transmission of the capacity and related energy from these units or stations.

“Electric utility” means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, or entity, or subdivision thereof, private, governmental, or other, wherever resident or organized, primarily engaged in the generation and sale or purchase and sale of electricity, or the transmission thereof, for ultimate consumption by the public.

“Foreign electric utility” means any electric utility other than a domestic electric utility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 171, § 1.

39-20-3.
Powers of domestic electric utilities.

Notwithstanding any contrary provisions of any general or special law relating to the powers and authorities of domestic electric utilities or any limitation imposed by their charters (which are hereby amended), but subject to the provisions of this title and this chapter, a domestic electric utility shall have the following additional powers:

Jointly or separately to plan, finance, construct, purchase, operate, maintain, use, share costs of, own, mortgage, lease, sell, provide services for, dispose of, or otherwise participate in electric-generating facilities, or portions thereof, within or without the state, or the product or service therefrom, or securities issued in connection with the financing of electric-generating facilities or portions thereof;

To enter into and perform contracts for joint or separate planning, financing, construction, purchase, operation, maintenance, use, sharing costs of, ownership, mortgaging, leasing, sale, providing services for, disposal of, or other participation in electric-generating facilities, or portions thereof, within or without the state, or the product or service therefrom, or securities issued in connection with the financing of electric-generating facilities or portions thereof, including, without limitation, contracts for the payment of obligations imposed without regard to the operational status of a facility or facilities and contracts with domestic or foreign electric utilities for the sale or purchase of electricity from an electric-generating facility or facilities for long or short periods of time or for the life of a specific electric-generating unit or units; and

To enter into and perform contracts for the transmission both within or without the state of the capacity and related energy from a specifically identified electric-generating facility, wherever located, to its own retail service territory, or to any purchaser of such capacity and related energy; provided, however, that nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a domestic electric utility to sell electricity at wholesale or retail within or without this state unless:

The sale is authorized under its charter or the general or special laws of this state other than this chapter; or

The sale constitutes a sale of capacity and related energy from a specifically identified electric-generating facility or a sale of economy, backup, and other energy therefrom.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1.

39-20-4.
Powers of foreign electric utilities and nonregulated power producers.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §§

7-1.2-1401

and

7-1.2-1402

, and any other provision of any general or special law relating to the rights of foreign corporations to transact business in this state and to produce a certificate of authority under chapter 1.2 of title 7 to transact business, limiting the powers, rights, and privileges of a foreign corporation procuring a certificate, and establishing the duties, restrictions, penalties, and liabilities imposed on a foreign corporation, but subject to the provisions of this chapter, a foreign electric utility:

Shall have the right to transact business in this state to the extent necessary or desirable to exercise the powers set forth in §

39-20-3

in connection with electric-generating facilities or portions thereof located within this state or the product or service therefrom or securities issued in connection with the financing of the facilities or portions thereof;

Shall be entitled to procure a certificate of authority under chapter 1.2 of title 7 to transact business; and

Shall have within this state the powers set forth in §

39-20-3

in connection with electric-generating facilities or portions thereof located within this state, or the product or service therefrom, or securities issued in connection with the financing of facilities or portions thereof.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize a foreign electric utility to sell electricity at wholesale or retail within this state unless:

The sale is authorized under its charter or the general or special laws of this state other than by this chapter; or

The sale constitutes a sale of capacity and related energy from a specifically identified electric-generating facility within this state or a sale of economy, backup, or other energy therefrom. Nonregulated power producers shall not be subject to this subsection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 332, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 316, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 25; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 25.

39-20-5.
Regulation of foreign electric utilities.

A foreign electric utility, in order to procure a certificate of authority to transact business in this state pursuant to this chapter, shall make application therefor to the secretary of state pursuant to the provisions of §§

7-1.2-1405

and

7-1.2-1406

and shall be subject to §§

7-1.2-1403

—

7-1.2-1418

,

7-1.2-1501

and

7-1.2-1601

—

7-1.2-1604

.

A foreign public utility that has received a certificate of authority to transact business in this state pursuant to this chapter:

Shall, before owning or operating an electric-generating facility in this state, notify the commission of the action to be taken by it;

Shall thereafter furnish to the commission annually a copy of the annual report filed by it with the utility regulatory agency of the state of its domicile or principal locus; and

Shall furnish to the commission, from time to time, such other information with respect to its activities in the state as the commission may reasonably request.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 36, § 25; P.L. 2005, ch. 72, § 25.

39-20-6.
Joint ownership and waiver of the right of partition.

If any domestic or foreign electric utility acquires or owns an interest as a tenant in common with one or more other domestic or foreign electric utilities in any electric-generating facility in this state, the surrender or waiver by any owner of the property of the right to partition the property for a period not exceeding the period for which the property is used or useful for electric utility purposes, shall not be invalid or unenforceable by reason of the length of the period, nor shall such surrender or waiver be construed as unduly restricting the alienation of the property.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1.

39-20-7.
Taxation.

The interests of domestic electric utilities and foreign electric utilities in all electric-generating facilities located in this state shall be liable to taxation by the cities and towns under the provisions of chapters 3 — 5 of title 44. To the extent that the interests may be exempt from taxation because: (1) The interests are owned by a quasi-municipal corporation that is exempt by the provisions of its charter from taxation by the city or town assessing the tax; or (2) The interests are owned by an individual, partnership, corporation, association, or entity that is exempt from taxation by any general or special law, the owners shall make payments to the city or town in lieu of those taxes in the same amounts as the taxes that would have been assessed were they not exempt. The payments in lieu of taxes to be made under this section shall be treated in the same manner as taxes for purposes of all procedural and substantive provisions of law, including appeals, now and hereafter in effect applicable to the levy, assessment, collection, cancellation, and abatement of the taxes.

Legislative consent is hereby given to the application of the laws of other states with respect to taxation, payments in lieu of taxes, and the assessment thereof to any domestic electric utility that has acquired or has an interest in an electric-generating facility or a portion thereof without the state or is otherwise acting without the state pursuant to powers granted in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 121.

39-20-8.
Regulation of activities of domestic electric utilities without the state.

Legislative consent is hereby given to the application of regulatory and other laws of other states and of the United States to any domestic electric utility that has acquired or has an interest in an electric-generating facility or a portion thereof without the state or is otherwise acting without the state pursuant to authority granted in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1.

39-20-9.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1976, ch. 332, § 2.

39-20-10.
Issuance of securities to finance electric-generating facilities.

The purposes for which a domestic public utility may issue stocks, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness, payable more than twelve (12) months from date of issue, pursuant to §§

39-3-15

,

39-3-17

—

39-3-19

, and

39-3-21

shall include the acquisition of ownership of, or other interests in, electric-generating facilities, within or without this state, or portions thereof.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

39-3-20

, any foreign electric utility, other than a governmental entity, that owns and operates any electric-generating facilities within this state or portions thereof shall be subject to the provisions of §§

39-3-15

,

39-3-17

—

39-3-19

, and §

39-3-21

and other regulatory laws within the state with respect to any financing of the cost of its acquisition of ownership of or other interests in the electric-generating facilities, including the issuance of stocks, bonds, or other evidences of indebtedness payable more than twelve (12) months from the date of issue; provided, however, that it shall be exempt from the provisions of this subsection upon the filing with the commission of certification by a regulatory commission of the state of domicile or principal locus of the foreign electric utility, or of the United States, that the regulatory commission has regulatory jurisdiction over the financing of the foreign electric utility.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1.

39-20-11.
Zoning and other municipal regulation.

For purposes of §

39-1-30

, any domestic and foreign electric utility that owns or participates in the ownership of any plant, building, wires, conductors, fixtures, structures, equipment, or apparatus in this state pursuant to this chapter shall be considered a company under the supervision of the commission.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1.

39-20-12.
Construction and severability.

This chapter shall be construed in all respects so as to meet all constitutional requirements. Except as expressly provided for in this chapter, the provisions of this chapter shall not affect the interpretation of other laws. If any provision of this chapter shall be held unconstitutional, the unconstitutionality shall not affect any other provisions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1975, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 121.